Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Licensing of Spray Painters

246.510.
License required. [Repealed.]

246.520.
Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

246.530.
Power of departmental agents. [Repealed.]

246.540.
Grounds for suspension or revocation of licenses. [Repealed.]

246.550.
Hearing. [Repealed.]

246.560.
Notice of revocation, suspension, or refusal to issue license — Appeal — Bond. [Repealed.]

246.570.
Change in ownership — Duty of new owner. [Repealed.]

246.580.
Exceptions to license requirement. [Repealed.]

246.590.
Disposition of fees. [Repealed.]